Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1819
Authority; perpetual succession; bylaws.

The authority shall have perpetual succession as a body politic and corporate and may adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct of its business.

Laws 1997, LB 809, § 19.